Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-143
National Guard; officers; fitness; determination.

At any time the moral character, capacity, and general fitness for the service of any National Guard officer may be determined by a board as provided by the United States. Commissions of officers of the National Guard may be vacated upon resignation, upon absence without leave for three months, upon recommendation of a board pursuant to sentence of a court-martial, or upon separation based upon the causes set forth in section 55-136. Officers of the guard rendered surplus by the disbandment of their organization shall be disposed of as provided by the United States. Officers may, upon their own application, be placed in the reserve as may be authorized by the United States.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 12, p. 660;

C.S.1929, § 55-117;

R.S.1943, § 55-122;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 41, p. 1595;

Laws 1978, LB 570, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 170, § 4.